client/braille/liblouis/tables/da-dk-g26.ctb
word ham 236
word hans 13456-234
begnum ys 56-13456-234
contraction ys
word han 13456
word har 125
word havde 125-1456
word hde =
word have 125-3456
word hve =
word hele 125-123-15
begnum hle 56-125-123-15
contraction hle
word heller 125-123-1235
begnum hlr 56-125-123-1235
contraction hlr
word helt 125-2345
begnum ht 56-125-2345
contraction ht
word hendes 125-234
begnum hs 56-125-234
contraction hs
word hende 125-145
begnum hd 56-125-145
contraction hd
word hjælpe 125-1234-15
begnum hpe 56-125-1234-15
contraction hpe
word hjælpende 125-1234-15-1345-1456 # *** temporary patch
word hjælpendes 125-1234-15-1345-1456-234 # *** temporary patch
word hjælper 125-1234-156
word hper =
word hun 136
word hvad 2456
word hvilke 2456-13-15
word hvke =
word hvilken 2456-13-126
word hvken =
word hvilket 2456-13-346
word hvket =
word hvis 2456-234
word hvs =
word hvordan 34-1
word hvora 34-56-1
word hvorefter 34-1356
word hvorst 34-234-2345
word hvorfor 34-124
word hvorf 34-56-124
word hvorigennem 34-24-12456
word hvorledes 34-15
word hvore 34-56-15
word hvormed 34-134
word hvorm 34-56-134
word hvornår 34-1345
word hvorn 34-56-1345
word hvorover 34-1346
word hvoror 34-135-1235
word hvorpå 34-1234
word hvorp 34-56-1234
word hvortil 34-2345
word hvort 34-56-2345
word hvorunder 34-12345
word hvornd 34-1345-145
word hvorved 34-1236
word hvorv 34-56-1236
word hvor 34

word igennem 24-12456
word ige =
word igen 35
word (igen) 236-24-1245-126-356
word ikke 24-13
begnum ik 56-24-13
contraction ik
word ingen 24-126
word ien =
word ingenting 24-24
begnum ii 56-24-24
contraction ii

word jeg 245
word jeg) 245-56-356

word kan 13
word kommer 13-156
word ker =
word kommet 13-346
word ket =
word komme 13-146
word kme =
word kom 13-134
begnum km 56-13-134
contraction km
word kunne 13-1246
word kne =
word kvinde 13-1236-1456
word kvde =
word kvindes 13-1236-1456-234
word kvdes =
word kvinden 13-1236-12346
word kvden =
word kvindens 13-1236-12346-234
word kvdens =
word kvinder 13-1236-23456
word kvder =
word kvinders 13-1236-23456-234
word kvders =
word kvinderne 13-1236-23456-1246
word kvderne =
word kvindernes 13-1236-23456-1246-234
word kvdernes =

word lang 123-1245
begnum lg 56-123-1245
contraction lg
word lange 123-12456
begnum lge 56-123-12456
contraction lge
word langt 123-1245-2345
begnum lgt 56-123-1245-2345
contraction lgt
word lidt 123-2345
begnum lt 56-123-2345
contraction lt
word ligesom 123-234
begnum ls 56-123-234
contraction ls
word lige 123
word lille 123-123
begnum ll 56-123-123
contraction ll

word mange 134-12456
word mge =
word med 134
word megen 146-126
word meen =
word meget 146-346
word meet =
word mellem 146-134
word mem =
word men 146
word menneske 146-123456-15
word meske =
word menneskes 146-123456-15-234
word meskes =
word menneskene 146-123456-15-1246
word meskene =
word menneskenes 146-123456-15-1246-234
word meskenes =
word mennesker 146-123456-156
word meskr =
word menneskers 146-123456-156-234
word meskrs =
word mennesket 146-123456-346
word meskt =
word menneskets 146-123456-346-234
word meskts =
word min 134-1345
begnum mn 56-134-1345
contraction mn
word mit 134-2345
begnum mt 56-145-2345
contraction mt
word mulighed 134-123-125
begnum mlh 56-134-123-125
contraction mlh
word muligheds 134-123-125-234
begnum mlhs 56-134-123-125-234
contraction mlhs
word muligheden 134-123-125-126
begnum mlhen 56-134-123-125-15-1345
contraction mlhen
word mulighedens 134-123-125-126-234
begnum mlhens 56-134-123-125-15-1345-234
contraction mlhens
word muligheder 134-123-125-156
word mlhder =
word muligheders 134-123-125-156-234
word mlhders =
word mulighederne 134-123-125-156-1246
word mlhderne =
word mulighedernes 134-123-125-156-1246-234
word mlhdernes =
word måske 134-123456
word msk =
word måtte 134-1256
word mte =

word naturlig 1345-2345-123
begnum ntl 56-1345-2345-123
contraction ntl
word naturligt 1345-2345-123-2345
begnum ntlt 56-1345-2345-123-2345
contraction ntlt
word naturligvis 1345-2345-1236
begnum ntv 56-1345-2345-1236
contraction ntv
word ned 1246
word nogen 1345-1345
begnum nn 56-1345-1345
contraction nn
word nogensinde 1345-234-1456
word nsde =
word noget 1345-2345
begnum nt 56-1345-2345
contraction nt
word nogle 1345-123-15
begnum nle 56-1345-123-15
contraction nle
word næste 1345-1256
word nte =
word næsten 1345-126
word nen =
word når 1345

word også 14-16
begnum cå 56-14-16
contraction cå
word og 14
word omkring 135-134-13
begnum omk 56-135-134-13
contraction omk
word op 135
word or =
word organisation 1346-1245-234
word orgs =
word organisations 1346-1245-234-234
word orgss =
word organisationen 1346-1245-234-126
word orgsen =
word organisationens 1346-1245-234-126-234
word orgsens =
word organisationer 1346-1245-234-156
word orgser =
word organisationers 1346-1245-234-156-234
word orgsers =
word organisationerne 1346-1245-234-156-1246
word orgserne =
word organisationernes 1346-1245-234-156-1246-234
word orgsernes =
word over 1346

word problem 1234-12
begnum pb 56-1234-12
contraction pb
word problems 1234-12-234
begnum pbs 56-1234-12-234
contraction pb
word problemet 1234-12-346
word pbet =
word problemets 1234-12-346-234
word pbets =
word problemer 1234-12-156
word pber =
word problemers 1234-12-156-234
word pbers =
word problemerne 1234-12-156-1246
word pberne =
word problemernes 1234-12-156-1246-234
word pbernes =
word punktskrift 1234-1345-123456
word pnsk =
word på 1234

word ret 12356
word rigtige 1235-12456
word rge =
word rigtigt 1235-2345
begnum rt 56-1235-2345
contraction rt
word rigtig 1235

word sagde 234-1456
word sammen 234-134
begnum sm 56-234-134
contraction sm
word samme 234-146
word sme =
word samtidig 234-134-2345
begnum smt 56-234-134-2345
contraction smt
word selvfølgelig 234-1236-124
begnum svf 56-234-1236-124
contraction svf
word selv 234-1236
begnum sv 56-234-1236
contraction sv
word sidste 234-1356-15
word sste =
word sidst 234-1356
word sst =
word sin 234-1345
begnum sn 56-234-1345
contraction sn
word sit 234-2345
begnum st 56-234-2345
contraction st
word skal 123456
word skulle 123456-123-15
word skle =
word snart 234-1235
begnum sr 56-234-1235
contraction sr
word som 234
word spørgsmål 234-1234-134
begnum spm 56-234-1234-134
contraction spm
word spørgsmåls 234-1234-134-234
begnum spms 56-234-1234-134-234
contraction spms
word spørgsmålet 234-1234-134-346
word spmet =
word spørgsmålets 234-1234-134-346-234
word spmets =
word spørgsmålene 234-1234-134-1246
word spmne =
word spørgsmålenes 234-1234-134-1246-234
word spmnes =
word stadig 1356-1245
word stg =
word sådan 16-1
begnum åa 56-16-1
contraction åa
word således 16-15
begnum åe 56-16-15
contraction åe
word så 16

word tid 2345-145
begnum td 56-2345-145
contraction td
word tidlig 2345-145-123
begnum tdl 56-2345-145-123
contraction tdl
word tidlige 2345-145-123-12456
word tdlge =
word tidligere 2345-145-123-12356
word tdlre =
word tidligst 2345-145-123-1356
word tdlst =
word tilbage 2345-12
begnum tb 56-2345-12
contraction tb
word tilfælde 2345-124
begnum tf 56-2345-124
contraction tf
word til 2345

word under 12345

word vanskelig 1236-123456
word vsk =
word vanskelige 1236-123456-15
word vske =
word vanskeligt 1236-123456-2345
word vskt =
word var 3456
word ved 1236
word vidste 1236-1356-15
word vste =
word ville 1236-123-15
begnum vle 56-1236-123-15
contraction vle
word vil 1236-123
begnum vl 56-1236-123
contraction vl
word virkelig 1236-1235-13
begnum vrk 56-1236-1235-13
contraction vrk
word været 1236-2345
begnum vt 56-1236-2345
contraction vt
word være 345


word øjeblik 246-245-12
begnum øjb 56-246-245-12
contraction øjb

#Part words and words
begword dansk 145-123456
begword dsk =
nocross always den 12346
nocross always der 23456
nocross always det 2346
nocross always de 1456
nocross always en 126
nocross always er 156
nocross always et 346
nocross begword gang 1245-1245
begword gg 56-1245-1245
nocross begword gange 1245-1-1345-12456 # *** temporary patch
nocross partword ge 12456
begword hjælpe 125-1234-15
nocross partword hv 2456
nocross partword ig 35
begword kvinde 13-1236-1456
begword kvde =
nocross partword me 146
begword menneske 146-123456-15
begword meske =
nocross partword nd 12345
nocross partword ne 1246
nocross partword or 1346
begword organisation 1346-1245-234
begword orgs =
begword problem 1234-12
nocross partword re 12356
nocross partword sk 123456
nocross partword st 1356
nocross always te 1256
begword virkelig 1236-1235-13
always www 2456-2456-2456

# Numsign/"ve", special case when back-translating
noback nocross partword ve 3456

# Additional words containing "hvor"
# these are made explicit in 6-dots to handle / better

word hvoraf 34-1-124
word hvorfra 34-124-1235-1
word hvorhen 34-125-126
word hvorhenne 34-125-126-1246
word hvori 34-24
word hvoriblandt 34-24-12-123-1-12345-2345
word hvorimellem 34-24-146-123-123-15-134
word hvorimod 34-24-134-135-145
word hvorlænge 34-123-345-1345-12456
word hvormange 34-134-1-1345-12456
word hvorom 34-135-134
word hvormeget 34-146-1245-346
word hvorudfra 34-136-145-124-1235-1
word hvorvidt 34-1236-24-145-2345
word ihvorvel 24-34-3456-123

# Rules and corrections for back-translation

#ve special case
nofor midendword ve 3456

# nondigletters covers small letters from k + various part word contractions with dots 5 or 6. Necesary to ensure correct back-translation.
attribute nondigletter klmnopqrstuvwxyzæøå\x017e\x00e0\x00e7\x00e8\x00e9\x00ea\x00eb\x00ee\x00ef\x00f4\x00f9\x00fb\x00fc\x283f\x2829\x282b\x2837
nofor before nondigletter begword ve 3456
nofor before nondigletter begword vea 3456-1
nofor sufword veade 3456-1-1456
nofor sufword veader 3456-1-23456
nofor sufword veage 3456-1-12456
nofor before nondigletter begword veag 3456-1-1245

# veb
nofor before nondigletter begword veb 3456-12
nofor before nondigletter begword veba 3456-12-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vebb 3456-12-12
nofor sufword vebbest 3456-12-12-15-1356
nofor before nondigletter begword vebe 3456-12-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vebi 3456-12-24

# vec
nofor before nondigletter begword vec 3456-14
nofor before nondigletter begword vecchi 3456-14-14-125-24

# ved
nofor before nondigletter begword ved 3456-145
nofor before nondigletter begword veda 3456-145-1
nofor sufword vedaer 3456-145-1-156
nofor before nondigletter begword vedb 3456-145-12
nofor sufword vedben 3456-145-12-126
nofor sufword vedbend 3456-145-12-15-12345
nofor sufword vedbenden 3456-145-12-126-12346
nofor before nondigletter begword vedc 3456-145-14
nofor before nondigletter begword vedd 3456-145-145
nofor before nondigletter begword vedda 3456-145-145-1
nofor sufword vedde 3456-145-1456
nofor sufword veddet 3456-145-2346
nofor sufword vede 3456-1456
nofor sufword veden 3456-12346
nofor sufword veder 3456-23456
nofor sufword vedet 3456-2346
nofor before nondigletter begword vedf 3456-145-124
nofor before nondigletter begword vedfa 3456-145-124-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vedfe 3456-145-124-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vedfi 3456-145-124-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vedg 3456-145-1245
nofor before nondigletter begword vedga 3456-145-1245-1
nofor sufword vedge 3456-145-12456
nofor before nondigletter begword vedgi 3456-145-1245-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vedh 3456-145-125
nofor before nondigletter begword vedha 3456-145-125-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vedhe 3456-145-125-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vedhef 3456-145-125-15-124
nofor sufword vedhefte 3456-145-125-15-124-1256
nofor before nondigletter begword vedhi 3456-145-125-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vedi 3456-145-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vedj 3456-145-245
nofor sufword vedst 3456-145-1356
nofor sufword vedte 3456-145-1256

# vee
nofor before nondigletter begword vee 3456-15
nofor before nondigletter begword veeb 3456-15-12
nofor sufword veen 3456-126
nofor sufword veer 3456-156
nofor sufword veet 3456-346
